src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX Q jis     jausi ja        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiojoj       jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiojoje      jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiosioms     jis       
SFX Q jis     jausi sias      jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiosiomis    jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiosiose     jis       
SFX Q jas     jausio          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiam         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausi           jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiu          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiame        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausi           jas       
SFX Q jas     jausi           jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiems        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausius         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiais        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuose       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausia          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausios         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiai         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausioje        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausioms        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausias         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiomis       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiose        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiasis       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiojo        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiajam       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausi j         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuoju       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiajame      jas       
SFX Q jas     jausieji        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausi j         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiesiems     jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuosius     jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiaisiais    jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuosiuose   jas       
SFX Q jas     jausioji        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiosios      jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiajai       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausi j         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausi ja        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiojoj       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiojoje      jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiosioms     jas       
SFX Q jas     jausi sias      jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiosiomis    jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiosiose     jas       
SFX Q jus     jausio          jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiam         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausi           jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiu          jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiame        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausi           jus       
SFX Q jus     jausi           jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiems        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausius         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiais        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiuose       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausia          jus       
SFX Q jus     jausios         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiai         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausioje        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausioms        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausias         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiomis       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiose        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiasis       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiojo        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiajam       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausi j         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiuoju       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiajame      jus       
SFX Q jus     jausieji        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausi j         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiesiems     jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiuosius     jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiaisiais    jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiuosiuose   jus       
SFX Q jus     jausioji        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiosios      jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiajai       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausi j         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausi ja        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiojoj       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiojoje      jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiosioms     jus       
SFX Q jus     jausi sias      jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiosiomis    jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiosiose     jus       
SFX Q tis      iausio         tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiam        tis       
SFX Q tis      iausi          tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiu         tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiame       tis       
SFX Q tis      iausi          tis       
SFX Q tis      iausi          tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiems       tis       
SFX Q tis      iausius        tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiais       tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiuose      tis       
SFX Q tis      iausia         tis       
SFX Q tis      iausios        tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiai        tis       
SFX Q tis      iausioje       tis       
SFX Q tis      iausioms       tis       
SFX Q tis      iausias        tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiomis      tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiose       tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiasis      tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiojo       tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiajam      tis       
SFX Q tis      iausi j        tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiuoju      tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiajame     tis       
SFX Q tis      iausieji       tis       
SFX Q tis      iausi j        tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiesiems    tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiuosius    tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiaisiais   tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiuosiuose  tis       
SFX Q tis      iausioji       tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiosios     tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiajai      tis       
SFX Q tis      iausi j        tis       
SFX Q tis      iausi ja       tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiojoj      tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiojoje     tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiosioms    tis       
SFX Q tis      iausi sias     tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiosiomis   tis       
SFX Q tis      iausiosiose    tis       
SFX Q tas      iausio         tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiam        tas       
SFX Q tas      iausi          tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiu         tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiame       tas       
SFX Q tas      iausi          tas       
SFX Q tas      iausi          tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiems       tas       
SFX Q tas      iausius        tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiais       tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiuose      tas       
SFX Q tas      iausia         tas       
SFX Q tas      iausios        tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiai        tas       
SFX Q tas      iausioje       tas       
SFX Q tas      iausioms       tas       
SFX Q tas      iausias        tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiomis      tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiose       tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiasis      tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiojo       tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiajam      tas       
SFX Q tas      iausi j        tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiuoju      tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiajame     tas       
SFX Q tas      iausieji       tas       
SFX Q tas      iausi j        tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiesiems    tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiuosius    tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiaisiais   tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiuosiuose  tas       
SFX Q tas      iausioji       tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiosios     tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiajai      tas       
SFX Q tas      iausi j        tas       
SFX Q tas      iausi ja       tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiojoj      tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiojoje     tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiosioms    tas       
SFX Q tas      iausi sias     tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiosiomis   tas       
SFX Q tas      iausiosiose    tas       
SFX Q tus      iausio         tus       
SFX Q tus      iausiam        tus       
SFX Q tus      iausi          tus       
SFX Q tus      iausiu         tus       
SFX Q tus      iausiame       tus       
SFX Q tus      iausi          tus       
SFX Q tus      iausi          tus       
SFX Q tus      iausiems       tus       
SFX Q tus      iausius        tus       
SFX Q tus      iausiais       tus       
SFX Q tus      iausiuose      tus       
SFX Q tus      iausia         tus       
SFX Q tus      iausios        tus       
SFX Q tus      iausiai        tus       
SFX Q tus      iausioje       tus       
SFX Q tus      iausioms       tus       
SFX Q tus      iausias        tus       
SFX Q tus      iausiomis      tus       
SFX Q tus      iausiose       tus       
SFX Q tus      iausiasis      tus       
