src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
adaptyvus/ANQ
ai kus/ANQ
akivaizdus/ANQ
aktyvus/ANQ
aliejuotas/ANQ
amaruotas/ANQ
anekdoti kas/ANQ
ankstokas/ANQ
antisemiti kas/ANQ
apetiti kas/ANQ
apkantus/ANQ
apstus/ANQ
ap valgus/ANQ
artus/ANQ
a trus/ANQ
atgalias/ANQ
atkilus/ANQ
atmenus/ANQ
atsargus/ANQ
atstus/ANQ
audrotas/ANQ
ausylas/ANQ
baik tus/ANQ
balsvas/ANQ
bar kus/ANQ
bedievi kas/ANQ
b ras/ANQ
beteisi kas/ANQ
blaivas/ANQ
blukus/ANQ
briaunotas/ANQ
b dininkas/ANQ
ceremoningas/ANQ
cukrinas/ANQ
dailus/ANQ
dantytas/ANQ
darnus/ANQ
da nokas/ANQ
d kingas/ANQ
derlus/ANQ
d sningas/ANQ
diametralus/ANQ
dilgus/ANQ
diskreti kas/ANQ
dokumenti kas/ANQ
draiskaliuotas/ANQ
draugi kas/ANQ
dribus/ANQ
drumstas/ANQ
dr   tas/ANQ
dulkus/ANQ
duoninas/ANQ
dvailas/ANQ
dviprasmi kas/ANQ
d iugus/ANQ
eiklus/ANQ
eksteritorialus/ANQ
elektringas/ANQ
epi kas/ANQ
erzlus/ANQ
fakti kas/ANQ
fiktyvus/ANQ
fundamentalus/ANQ
gai us/ANQ
galingas/ANQ
garbingas/ANQ
g slus/ANQ
g dingas/ANQ
gele ingas/ANQ
geranori kas/ANQ
giminingas/ANQ
girtas/ANQ
gyvuli kas/ANQ
globalus/ANQ
gob i kas/ANQ
graib tus/ANQ
graudulingas/ANQ
griaudus/ANQ
grizlus/ANQ
gr d tas/ANQ
g dus/ANQ
guzuotas/ANQ
identi kas/ANQ
iliustratyvus/ANQ
inertus/ANQ
interaktyvus/ANQ
i daigingas/ANQ
i ilgas/ANQ
i laidus/ANQ
i pra us/ANQ
i takus/ANQ
i  argas/ANQ
jaukus/ANQ
jotas/ADNQ
juokdari kas/ANQ
kabus/ANQ
kaitus/ANQ
kalningas/ANQ
kampuotas/ANQ
kanoni kas/ANQ
kari kas/ANQ
kasdieni kas/ANQ
kaupinas/ANQ
keleriopas/ANQ
kemsuotas/ANQ
keterotas/ANQ
kiau iniuotas/ANQ
kilniadvasi kas/ANQ
kirm liuotas/ANQ
klampus/ANQ
kliautingas/ANQ
klupus/ANQ
knygi kas/ANQ
kompakti kas/ANQ
konservatyvus/ANQ
koriuotas/ANQ
krantuotas/ANQ
kreiduotas/ANQ
kriti kas/ANQ
kruop tas/ANQ
k liavirs ias/ANQ
kuplus/ANQ
kutuotas/ANQ
labdaringas/ANQ
laipus/ANQ
lakstus/ANQ
la iningas/ANQ
leid iamas/ANQ
lengvokas/ANQ
liberali kas/ANQ
lietuvi kas/ANQ
lipnus/ANQ
lydus/ANQ
lobus/ANQ
luk as/ANQ
mainus/ANQ
maloningas/ANQ
margas/ADNQ
ma inalus/ANQ
maunus/ANQ
medicini kas/ANQ
meistri kas/ANQ
melodrami kas/ANQ
m si kas/ANQ
metus/ANQ
miestieti kas/ANQ
mil ini kas/ANQ
mirtingas/ANQ
modernus/ANQ
molinas/ANQ
moteri kas/ANQ
m si kas/ANQ
nagingas/ANQ
narus/ANQ
neapsakomas/ANQ
negalingas/ANQ
ne tikimas/ANQ
neleistinas/ANQ
nendr tas/ANQ
nepaperkamas/ANQ
nerimastingas/ANQ
neurotoksi kas/ANQ
niekus/ANQ
niurgzlus/ANQ
normatyvus/AQ
nuobodus/ANQ
nuokalnus/ANQ
nuosaulus/ANQ
nuotykingas/ANQ
odi kas/ANQ
oran inis/BNQ
o kinga/ANQ
pagarbus/ANQ
pagyrus/ANQ
pai inas/ANQ
pakantus/ANQ
pakulotas/ANQ
pamatuotas/ANQ
paplok  ias/ANQ
pary ieti kas/AQ
pasaki kas/ANQ
pasigail tinas/ANQ
pasklidas/ANQ
pastabus/ANQ
patikimas/ANQ
patvarus/ANQ
paveldimas/ANQ
pa aidus/ANQ
pel di kas/ANQ
pentinuotas/ANQ
persi kas/ANQ
pieninas/ANQ
piktadari kas/ANQ
pilnas/ANQ
pirati kas/ANQ
plai us/ANQ
plau ingas/ANQ
pliuk nas/ANQ
plunksni kas/ANQ
pompasti kas/ANQ
prabangus/ANQ
prakeiktas/ANQ
pranarotas/ANQ
pra nus/ANQ
pra ambus/ANQ
preventyvus/ANQ
prierai us/ANQ
prievartingas/ANQ
primanus/ANQ
pritinkus/ANQ
profesori kas/ANQ
protokoli kas/ANQ
p gotas/ANQ
puolus/ANQ
pusiausviras/ANQ
putrotas/ANQ
raibas/ANQ
raiteli kas/ANQ
rangus/ANQ
raudas/ANQ
raupsuotas/ANQ
regresyvus/ANQ
r klus/ANQ
rentabilus/ANQ
retrospektyvus/ANQ
riestas/ANQ
ritmingas/ANQ
ryzgus/ANQ
rudas/ANQ
r kuotas/ANQ
rusi kas/ANQ
sadisti kas/ANQ
sakuotas/ANQ
s moningas/ANQ
sargalingas/ANQ
saul tas/ANQ
savanori kas/ANQ
savininki kas/ANQ
s  iningas/ANQ
s kmingas/ANQ
senovi kas/ANQ
siauraproti kas/ANQ
sielvartingas/ANQ
silpnokas/ANQ
skaitlingas/ANQ
skanus/ANQ
skepti kas/ANQ
skliaus ias/ANQ
skubrus/ANQ
slidokas/ANQ
sm l tas/ANQ
smurtingas/ANQ
sopus/ANQ
spygliuotas/ANQ
sraigti kas/ANQ
stamantrus/ANQ
stilizuotas/ANQ
stuomeningas/ANQ
suodinas/ANQ
svaigus/ANQ
svog nuotas/ANQ
tanus/ANQ
tau kus/ANQ
tekus/ANQ
tiesokas/ANQ
tirpus/ANQ
tolus/ANQ
trenksmingas/ANQ
tr kstamas/ANQ
turiningas/ANQ
tvirtas/ANQ
uol tas/ANQ
u daras/ADNQ
vagi kas/ANQ
vaizdus/ANQ
valkus/ANQ
variuotas/ANQ
va iuotas/ANQ
v jingas/ANQ
vergvaldi kas/ANQ
vertikalus/ANQ
vienalaiki kas/ANQ
vienpusi kas/ANQ
vilnotas/ANQ
visagali kas/ANQ
vy niuotas/ANQ
